lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių priežiūra: Vandens transporto priemonių valikliai; Vandens transporto priemonių poliravimo priemonės
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele og tilbehør til fartøjer > Pleje af fartøjer: Rengøringsmidler til fartøjer; Politurer til fartøjer
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za plovila > Njega plovila: Sredstva za čišćenje plovila; Sredstva za poliranje plovila
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderdelen en accessoirs voor vaartuigen > Onderhoud voor vaartuigen: Reinigingsmiddelen voor watervoertuigen; Poetsmiddelen voor watervoertuigen
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船艇維護: 船艇清理用品; 船用拋光劑
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Care: Watercraft Cleaners; Watercraft Polishes
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli in dodatki za vodna plovila > Nega vodnih plovil: Čistila za vodna plovila; Polirna sredstva za vodna plovila
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ για σκάφη > Φροντίδα σκαφών: Καθαριστικά σκαφών; Γυαλιστικά σκαφών
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese și accesorii pentru ambarcațiuni > Îngrijirea ambarcațiunilor: Produse de curățare pentru ambarcațiuni; Produse de lustruit pentru ambarcațiuni
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bộ phận & linh kiện tàu thuyền > Dịch vụ chăm sóc tàu thủy: Dung dịch làm sạch tàu thuyền; Sơn tàu thuyền
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Parti e accessori imbarcazioni > Cura imbarcazioni: Detergenti imbarcazioni; Lucidanti imbarcazioni
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-gondozás: Vízijármű-tisztítók; Vízijármű-fényezők
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Acessórios e peças para embarcações > Cuidado de embarcações: Produtos de limpeza de embarcações; Polimento de embarcações
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças e acessórios para embarcações > Cuidados com embarcações: Produtos de limpeza para embarcações; Polimentos de embarcações
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Accesorios y piezas para embarcaciones > Cuidado para embarcaciones: Limpiadores para embarcaciones; Pulidores para embarcaciones
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées et accessoires nautiques > Entretien de bateaux: Nettoyants pour bateaux; Produits à polir pour bateaux
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części i akcesoria do jednostek pływających > Konserwacja i pielęgnacja jednostek pływających: Środki do czyszczenia jednostek pływających; Politury do jednostek pływających
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre plavidlá > Starostlivosť o plavidlá: Čistiace prostriedky na plavidlá; Leštidlá na plavidlá
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶メンテナンス用品: 船舶用クリーナー; 船舶用研磨剤
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen hoito: Veneen puhdistusaineet; Veneen kiillotusaineet
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Запчасти и аксессуары для водного транспорта > Товары для ухода за водным транспортом: Чистящие средства для водного транспорта; Полироли для водного транспорта
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Delar och tillbehör till fartyg > Vård av fartyg: Rengöring av fartyg; Polermedel för fartyg
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части и аксесоари за плавателни съдове > Грижи за плавателни съдове: Препарати за почистване на плавателни съдове; Препарати за полиране на плавателни съдове
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件 > 船舶护理: 游艇清洁剂; 船舶上光剂
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เรือ > การดูแลเรือ: ที่ทำความสะอาดเรือ; ที่ขัดเงาเรือ
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Su Jetli Tekne Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Tekne Bakımı: Tekne Temizleyicileri; Tekne Parlatıcıları
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly a příslušenství k motorovým člunům > Péče o motorové čluny: Čističe motorových člunů; Leštidla na motorové čluny
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 선박 부품/부대용품 > 선박 관리: 선박 세척제; 선박용 광택제
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Båtdeler og -tilbehør > Båtpleie: Rengjøring av båt; Polering av båt
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugteile & Zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugpflege: Wasserfahrzeugreiniger; Wasserfahrzeugpolituren